Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,115
Bonds in discharge of judgments; power to issue; limit.

An irrigation district shall have power to issue bonds in consideration of the discharge of judgments held against it in an amount not exceeding by more than one thousand dollars the principal and interest of judgments so discharged.

Laws 1925, c. 128, § 2, p. 336;

C.S.1929, § 46-179;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,115.